Washington statutes.
RCW 35.102.100

Claim period.

The provisions relating to the time period allowed for an assessment or correction of an assessment for additional taxes, penalties, or interest shall be in accordance with chapter 82.32 RCW.

[ 2003 c 79 s 10.]